Ohio, session 136, SB139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.295 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5.295. The thirteenth day of May is designated as 6
"Judge Nathaniel R. Jones Day" in honor of the attorney, judge, 7
and professor of law who was born on that day in Youngstown, 8
Ohio, in 1928, and who committed his life to the advancement of 9
civil rights. 10